Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Jurisdiction and Initiation of Investigations.

Administrative Code. —

For investigations, see 21 AAC 20.

Sec. 24.55.100.
Jurisdiction.

The ombudsman has jurisdiction to investigate the administrative acts of agencies.

The ombudsman may exercise the ombudsman’s powers without regard to the finality of an administrative act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For receiving and processing complaints, see 21 AAC 20, art. 1.

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

Sec. 24.55.110.
Investigation of complaints.

The ombudsman shall investigate any complaint that is an appropriate subject for investigation under AS

24.55.150

, unless the ombudsman reasonably believes that

there is presently available an adequate remedy for the grievance stated in the complaint;

the complaint relates to a matter that is outside the jurisdiction of the ombudsman;

the complaint relates to an administrative act of which the complainant has had knowledge for an unreasonable length of time before the complaint was submitted;

the complainant does not have a sufficient personal interest in the subject matter of the complaint;

the complaint is trivial or made in bad faith;

the resources of the ombudsman’s office are insufficient for adequate investigation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For receiving and processing complaints, see 21 AAC 20, art. 1.

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.

Sec. 24.55.120.
Investigation on the ombudsman’s motion.

The ombudsman may investigate the administrative act of an agency on the ombudsman’s own motion if the ombudsman reasonably believes that it is an appropriate subject for investigation under AS

24.55.150

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.130.
Notice to complainant.

If the ombudsman decides not to investigate a complaint, the ombudsman shall inform the complainant of that decision and shall state the reasons.

If the ombudsman decides to investigate a complaint, the ombudsman shall notify the complainant of the decision.

Notice given under this section may be oral but the ombudsman shall state in writing the reasons for not investigating a complaint if requested by the complainant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For receiving and processing complaints, see 21 AAC 20, art. 1.

Sec. 24.55.140.
Notice to the agency.

If the ombudsman decides to investigate a complaint, the ombudsman shall notify the agency of the intention to investigate unless the ombudsman believes that advance notice will unduly hinder the investigation or make it ineffectual. Notice given under this section may be oral or written, at the discretion of the ombudsman.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 71 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For conducting an investigation, see 21 AAC 20, art. 2.